South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3599.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 22-3-545(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 22-3-540 and 22-3-550, a criminal case, the penalty for which the crime in the case does not exceed five thousand five hundred dollars or one yearthree years imprisonment, or both, either as originally charged or as charged pursuant to the terms of a plea agreement, may be transferred from general sessions court if the provisions of this section are followed. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----